Hawaii statutes.
[§412:2-110] Emergency applications.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an application may be approved by the
commissioner without investigation, notice, comment, or hearing in any case in
which the commissioner determines to be an emergency arising from the
insolvency of an existing institution or to prevent the failure of an existing
institution. No emergency application may be granted unless the commissioner
determines that the relevant statutory criteria have been met. Notwithstanding
the granting of any approval, if the commissioner discovers good cause why an
approval should not have been granted, the approval may be revoked by giving
written notice of revocation to the applicant. [L 2001, c 170, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next